Tennessee, session 114, HB1764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
WHEREAS, Brigadier General Donald F. Hawkins, served the citizens of this nation,
State of Tennessee, and the county of McNairy for over thirty-six years in the Tennessee
National Guard; and
WHEREAS, Brigadier General Donald F. Hawkins, began his military career in 1960 as
a Private, rising to the rank of Brigadier General. General Hawkins exemplified leadership and
commitment throughout his distinguished military career, demonstrating his duty to the
Tennessee Army National Guard, until his retirement in 1997 as a Brigadier General
commanding the 30th Separate Armored Brigade of the Tennessee Army National Guard; and
WHEREAS, Brigadier General Donald F. Hawkins is the only citizen of McNairy County
that has risen to the rank of General in any branch of the Armed Services of our nation; and
WHEREAS, the Mayor and Board of Commissioners of the county of McNairy,
Tennessee, should remember the invaluable service of one of its citizens, Brigadier General
Donald F. Hawkins; now, therefore,
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 58, Chapter 1, Part 5, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
58-1-517.
(a) The army national guard armory, located in McNairy County, is hereby
designated as the "Brigadier General Donald F. Hawkins Army National Guard Armory",
HB1764
009814
- 1 -

in honor of Brigadier General Donald F. Hawkins and his valuable service to the army
national guard and the state of Tennessee.
(b) From existing resources, the department of military is directed to erect
suitable signs or to affix suitable markers designating such edifice as the "Brigadier
General Donald F. Hawkins Army National Guard Armory".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009814